Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 12.61.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“crime involving domestic violence” has the meaning given in AS

18.66.990

;

“person acting on behalf of a defendant” includes the defendant’s attorney, an agent of the defendant or the defendant’s attorney, or a person specified by the court under AS

12.61.120(b)

or an agent of that person, but does not include the defendant;

“victim” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

;

“witness” means a person contacted in connection with a criminal case because the person may have knowledge or information about the criminal case.

History.

(§ 11 ch 59 SLA 1989; am §§ 21, 72 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (1) was enacted as (3), paragraph (2) was enacted as (4), and paragraph (4) was enacted as (5). Renumbered in 1996, at which time former paragraph (2) was renumbered as (3).